Maryland, session 2025, HB0855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 448 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup on Establishing a Science and Technology Best
Practices and Innovation Network.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Executive Director of the Maryland Technology Development
Corporation, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(4) one representative of the University of Maryland, Baltimore County,
designated by the President of the University;
(5) [five] TWO representatives appointed by the Governor who:
(i) have expertise or experience in fostering community–based
applications and using science or technology in teaching, mentoring, or hobbying; and
– 1 –

Ch. 749 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) reflect the racial, ethnic, religious, gender, and geographic
diversity of the State;
(6) [five] TWO representatives of institutions of higher education in the
State with expertise in current science or technology research, industry, or innovation,
appointed by the Governor, including at least one representative each from:
(i) a historically Black college or university;
(ii) an independent institution of higher education; and
(iii) a community college;
(7) [two representatives] ONE REPRESENTATIVE from the private sector
with expertise in current developments in science or technology research, industry, or
innovation; and
(8) [two representatives] ONE REPRESENTATIVE from the nonprofit
sector with expertise in or history of recognized advocacy on behalf of ethical and human
practices and protections in science and technology research, industry, or innovation.
(c) The Workgroup shall elect a chair from among its members.
(d) The University of Maryland, Baltimore County shall provide staff for the
Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) identify and analyze options for establishing and maintaining an open
access science, technology, and innovation network or hub of citizen scientists and experts
in science, technology, and industry to:
(i) facilitate noninstitutional voluntary collaboration;
(ii) facilitate the open exchange of ideas and nonproprietary
state–of–the–art and evidence–based data and information; and
(iii) promote solution development and decision making based on
sound science, innovation, and best practices;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 749
(2) identify and evaluate methods for:
(i) establishing a digital or virtual referral network of experts in
science, technology, and industry, including expansion of existing entities and networks;
(ii) registering expert participants; and
(iii) making network expertise available to the public; and
(3) make recommendations regarding the establishment of a science and
technology best practices and innovation network.
(g) On or before December 1, [2024] 2026, the Workgroup shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [1 year] 3 YEARS and 1 month and, at the
end of June 30, [2025] 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –